Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.300

Persons exempted from certain penalties under RCW 15.58.150.

The penalties provided for violations of RCW 15.58.150(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) shall not apply to:

(1) Any carrier while lawfully engaged in transporting a pesticide within the state, if such carrier, upon request, permits the director to copy all records showing the transaction in and movement of the articles.

(2) Public officials of the state and the federal government engaged in the performance of their official duties.

(3) The manufacturer or shipper of a pesticide for experimental use only by or under the supervision of an agency of this state or of the federal government authorized by law to conduct research in the field of pesticides.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 30.]